Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 6. Water Districts and Commissioners

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-3-601.
Division of state into districts.

The board of control shall divide the state into water districts, said water districts to be so constituted as to secure the best protection to the claimants for water and the most economical supervision on the part of the state; in laying out such districts each stream system of practicable administrative scope shall be included within a single district.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 40; R.S. 1899, § 888; C.S. 1910, § 799; C.S. 1920, § 920; R.S. 1931, § 122-301; Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 26, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-301; W.S. 1957, § 41-61.

Adjudication. —

Under this section and the following sections, a decision of a commissioner and superintendent as to right to use of water, though not appealed from, is not an adjudication conclusive on the courts. Ryan v. Tutty, 13 Wyo. 122, 78 P. 661,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1904).

Adjudication means the determination of priorities by the board and need not cover all appropriations on the streams and tributaries involved. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Authority to divide. —

Where the board adjudicated waters between two streams in separate proceedings, the water commissioner had authority to divide the water between the two streams though the proceedings were not binding on persons on one stream who were not parties to the adjudication proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Where board adjudicated priorities on a stream and the tributary in separate proceedings, though appropriators on one stream were not parties to the action respecting the other, adjudications were sufficient to give power to the water commissioner to divide the water between the streams, though the proceedings were not binding on those not parties. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Water commissioners are not vested with arbitrary control; instead they are required to see that water is divided among the several appropriators in strict accordance with adjudicated or determined rights. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Suit against state. —

Nebraska irrigation district action to restrain Wyoming water officials from unlawfully permitting junior appropriators to take water and to compel distribution in proper order is not suit against state. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Cited

in

Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Priority and Progress — Case Studies in the Transfer of Water Rights,” see I Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1966).

For article, “Transfer of Water Rights — Errata and Addenda — Sales for Recreational Purposes and to Districts,” see II Land & Water L. Rev. 321 (1967).

§ 41-3-602.
Commissioners; appointment; term; removal; filling of vacancies; hydrographers.

The governor shall appoint a water commissioner for each water district, if needed, who shall be selected from persons recommended by the superintendent of the water division in which the water district is situated with the advice of the board of county commissioners of the county or counties, lying wholly or partly within the water district. The water commissioner shall be an employee of the state engineer. Each commissioner shall hold his office until his successor is appointed and shall have qualified, and the governor shall, by like selection and appointment, fill all vacancies which shall occur in the office of water commissioners, and may, at any time, remove any water commissioner as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The governor may appoint a water commissioner to more than one (1) district on recommendation of the division superintendent and the county commissioners of the interested county or counties.

Also, where the legislature has appropriated state funds for payment of full time water commissioners, the governor may appoint water commissioners to be known as hydrographer water commissioners for one (1) or more water districts on recommendation of the state engineer and the superintendent of the water division in which any such district is located. The governor may remove any commissioner appointed under this subsection as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 41; R.S. 1899, § 889; Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 6; C.S. 1910, § 800; C.S. 1920, § 921; R.S. 1931, § 122-302; Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 26, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-302; Laws 1957, ch. 79, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-62; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 157, § 1.

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911).

§ 41-3-603.
Commissioners; general powers and duties; appeals from decisions.

The water commissioner shall, as near as may be practicable, divide, regulate and control the use of the water of all streams, springs, lakes or other sources of water within his district as will prevent the waste of water or its use in excess of the volume to which the appropriator is lawfully entitled. The water commissioner has the authority to require the filling of any reservoir whenever practical and whenever water is available for storage from the stream from which the appropriation is established.

Any person who may be injured by the action or inaction of the water commissioner has the right to appeal to the division superintendent and, from his decision, the person aggrieved may appeal to the state engineer. From the decision of the state engineer, an appeal may be taken to the district court of the county where the ditch or ditches, reservoir, well or wells over which the controversy arises are situated.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 61, § 29; R.S. 1887, § 1359; R.S. 1899, § 891; Laws 1901, ch. 102, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 802; C.S. 1920, § 923; Laws 1925, ch. 84, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-304; C.S. 1945, § 71-306; W.S. 1957, § 41-63; Laws 1971, ch. 27, § 16; 1979, ch. 88, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

Commissioners cannot exercise police power vested in them beyond state lines.

Mitchell Irrigation Dist. v. Whiting, 59 Wyo. 52, 136 P.2d 502,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1943), cert. denied, 322 U.S. 727, 64 S. Ct. 944, 88 L. Ed. 1563, 1944 U.S. LEXIS 821 (U.S. 1944).

Presumptions by appropriator. —

Appropriator may presume not only that appropriators above him are taking only amount of water to which they are entitled, but also that officials who regulate and distribute waters of the state are doing their duty. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

“Volume” of water. —

“The volume (of water) to which an appropriator is lawfully entitled” is at any time the quantity within the limits of his appropriation, which an appropriator then can and does apply to the uses stated in his certificate. Parshall v. Cowper, 22 Wyo. 385, 143 P. 302,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1914).

Indispensable parties. —

In mandatory injunction action to compel commissioner to prevent diversion of water from river by junior appropriators, it was imperative that latter be given their day in court before water should be shut off from their ditches. Mitchell Irrigation Dist. v. Whiting, 59 Wyo. 52, 136 P.2d 502,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1943), cert. denied, 322 U.S. 727, 64 S. Ct. 944, 88 L. Ed. 1563, 1944 U.S. LEXIS 821 (U.S. 1944).

Mandamus does not lie where section provides appeal. —

Issues involved could not be disposed of in mandamus proceedings, but by appeal under this section or by an appropriate legal or equitable action. Le Beau v. State, 377 P.2d 302,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1963).

Mandatory injunction. —

Substantial evidence supported judgment declining mandatory injunction sought by Nebraska irrigation district which had headgate and diversion works in Wyoming, where injunction would have compelled commissioners to prevent water diversion by junior appropriators though ample water passed headgate and injunction would not benefit Nebraska district. Mitchell Irrigation Dist. v. Whiting, 59 Wyo. 52, 136 P.2d 502,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1943), cert. denied, 322 U.S. 727, 64 S. Ct. 944, 88 L. Ed. 1563, 1944 U.S. LEXIS 821 (U.S. 1944).

Unsigned “memo” contemplating arrangement whereby if plaintiff irrigation district was successful in closing Wyoming canals, another district having prior rights would permit plaintiff additional water, was insufficient to establish plaintiff would benefit by injunction, memo being without consideration and subject to termination upon 24 hours notice to Nebraska officials. Mitchell Irrigation Dist. v. Whiting, 59 Wyo. 52, 136 P.2d 502,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1943), cert. denied, 322 U.S. 727, 64 S. Ct. 944, 88 L. Ed. 1563, 1944 U.S. LEXIS 821 (U.S. 1944).

Cited

in

Ryan v. Tutty, 13 Wyo. 122, 78 P. 661,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1904); Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911); Bales v. Ankney, 382 P.2d 386,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 1963); In re The General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River System and All Other Sources, State of Wyoming, 835 P.2d 273,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For case note on Kearney Lake, Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake DeSmet Reservoir Co., 487 P.2d 324,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1971), see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 599 (1972).

§ 41-3-604.
Commissioners; additional powers and duties; defense by county attorney.

It shall be the duty of the said water commissioner to divide the water of the natural stream or streams of his district among the several ditches and reservoirs taking water therefrom, according to the prior right of each, respectively, in whole or in part, and to shut and fasten, or cause to be shut and fastened, the headgates of ditches and shall regulate or cause to be regulated the controlling works of reservoirs, in times of scarcity of water, as may be necessary by reason of the priorities of right existing from said streams of his district. Such water commissioner shall have authority to regulate the distribution of water among the various users under any partnership or incorporated ditch or any ditch owned by joint owners not incorporated and not in a partnership, or partnership or incorporated reservoir or reservoir owned by joint owners not incorporated or not included in a partnership, where rights have been adjudicated, in accordance with existing decrees. Whenever, in the pursuance of his duties, the water commissioner regulates a headgate to a ditch or the controlling works of reservoirs, it shall be his duty to attach to such headgate or controlling works a written notice, properly dated and signed, setting forth the fact that such headgate or controlling works has been properly regulated and is wholly under his control and such notice shall be a legal notice to all parties interested in the division and distribution of the water of such ditch or reservoir. It shall be the duty of the county attorney to appear and defend the division superintendent or any water commissioner who shall be made a defendant in any case which may arise in the pursuance of the official duties of any such officer within the county of such county attorney.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 42; R.S. 1899, § 890; Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 7; C.S. 1910, § 801; C.S. 1920, § 922; Laws 1931, ch. 109, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-303; C.S. 1945, § 71-303; W.S. 1957, § 41-64; Laws 1965, ch. 168, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

Administrative officers. —

In distributing water by the commissioners they act as administrative officers only, under the police power of the state. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Commissioners are not vested with arbitrary control;

instead they are required to see that water is divided among the several appropriators in strict accordance with adjudicated or determined rights. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Division superintendent and water commissioners are charged exclusively with administrative duties in superintending diversion and distribution of water in strict conformity with adjudicated or determined priorities. Mitchell Irr. Dist. v. Sharp, 121 F.2d 964, 1941 U.S. App. LEXIS 3370 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 314 U.S. 667, 62 S. Ct. 129, 86 L. Ed. 534, 1941 U.S. LEXIS 241 (U.S. 1941).

Authority to divide. —

Where the board adjudicated priorities on a stream and the tributary in separate proceedings, though appropriators on one stream were not parties to the action respecting the other, adjudications were sufficient to give power to the commissioner to divide the water between the streams, though the proceedings were not binding on those not parties. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Power of courts not superseded. —

The board is primarily an administrative body, and its implied power to adjudicate water right priorities is not exclusive; the power of the courts has not been superseded, and an action to determine priorities may be brought in the courts. Simmons v. Ramsbottom, 51 Wyo. 419, 68 P.2d 153,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1937).

Notice mentioned herein was not objectionable as taking of property

without due process of law in that no hearing of the owner is provided for. Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1911).

Presumption that commissioners act legally. —

It will be generally presumed that the acts of the water commissioners in distributing water are legal. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Appropriator may presume not only that appropriators above him are taking only amount of water to which they are entitled, but also that officials who regulate and distribute waters of the state are doing their duty. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Illegal closing of headgates. —

In an action by plaintiff, claiming priority rights, to recover damages and enjoin water commissioner and state engineer for closing headgates of plaintiff's irrigation ditch, the presumption in favor of legality of acts of defendants was overcome where pleadings showed that the defendants closed the headgates to enforce rights of persons claiming junior priorities. Under the pleadings such acts were illegal and in violation of this section. Merrill v. Bishop, 69 Wyo. 45, 237 P.2d 186,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1951).

Proper parties in action for damages for closing headgates. —

Plaintiff, a senior appropriator of waters as successor in interest of Indian allottees and patentees, filed an action for damages and an injunction against water commissioner and state engineer for closing of the headgates to his irrigation district. It was held that he was not required to join junior appropriators as parties to the action, but that other parties, allottees and patentees or their successors in interest who had an equal right to the waters should be made parties to the action. Merrill v. Bishop, 69 Wyo. 45, 237 P.2d 186,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1951).

Stated

in

Le Beau v. State, 377 P.2d 302,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 1963).

Cited

in

Willey v. Decker, 11 Wyo. 496, 73 P. 210,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1903); Ryan v. Tutty, 13 Wyo. 122, 78 P. 661,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1904); Van Buskirk v. Red Buttes Land & Livestock Co., 24 Wyo. 183, 156 P. 1122,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1916).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

§ 41-3-605.
Commissioners; power to arrest; procedure following arrests.

The water commissioners or their assistants, within their districts shall have power to arrest any person or persons offending, and turn them over to the sheriff of the proper county, and immediately upon delivering the person so arrested into the custody of the sheriff, it shall be the duty of the water commissioner making the arrest, to immediately in writing and upon oath, make complaint before the court of proper jurisdiction against the person arrested.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 42; R.S. 1899, § 972; C.S. 1910, § 818; C.S. 1920, § 939; R.S. 1931, § 122-1206; C.S. 1945, § 71-305; W.S. 1957, § 41-65; Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “court of proper jurisdiction” for “proper justice of the peace,” and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

§ 41-3-606.
Commissioners; performance of duties; requests for regulation.

Each water commissioner shall perform his duties under the general direction and supervision of the superintendent of his water division. Any holder of a Wyoming water right may request that the source of supply for his water rights be regulated by a water commissioner as authorized by law and in accordance with established priorities. Requests for regulation shall be in writing submitted to a water commissioner or water superintendent.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 45; R.S. 1899, § 894; Laws 1901 ch. 102, § 2; 1907, ch. 86, § 10; C.S. 1910, § 805; C.S. 1920, § 926; R.S. 1931, § 122-307; C.S. 1945, § 71-309; W.S. 1957, § 41-66; Laws 1991, ch. 157, § 1.

Superintendent may, under any condition, call upon commissioner for work within district

whenever the necessity therefor may in his judgment arise. Van Buskirk v. Red Buttes Land & Livestock Co., 24 Wyo. 183, 156 P. 1122,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1916).

Cited

in

Ryan v. Tutty, 13 Wyo. 122, 78 P. 661,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(1904); Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911).

§ 41-3-607.
Commissioners; salaries and expenses.

Water commissioners shall be paid a salary recommended by the state engineer and the division superintendent and approved by the governor. Water commissioners shall be paid by the state according to the procedures established by the human resources division of the department of administration and information. Funding for water commissioner salaries and expenses shall be provided by the state.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8 § 43; R.S. 1899, § 892; Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 8; C.S. 1910, § 803; Laws 1917, ch. 60, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 924; R.S. 1931, § 122-305; Laws 1933, Sp. Sess, ch. 20, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-307; Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 7, § 1; 1953, ch. 33, § 1; 1957, ch. 32, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-67; Laws 1973, ch. 130, § 1; 1991, ch. 157, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1.

Cited

in

Van Buskirk v. Red Buttes Land & Livestock Co., 24 Wyo. 183, 156 P. 1122,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1916).

§ 41-3-608.
Commissioners; reports.

All water commissioners, when on duty, shall make reports whenever called upon to do so, by the division superintendent of their division. Said reports shall contain the following information:

The amount of water actually coming into the district to supply ditches, canals and reservoirs;

Whether such supply is on the increase or decrease;

What ditches, canals and reservoirs are at that time without their proper supply; and

Such other and further information as the division superintendent of that division may require.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 17; R.S. 1899, § 853; Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 758; C.S. 1920, § 879; R.S. 1931, § 122-206; C.S. 1945, § 71-106; W.S. 1957, § 41-68.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-3-609.
Commissioners; disqualification for personal interest or prejudice.

Whenever an affidavit is filed with the state engineer by a water user stating that the water commissioner of a district has a personal interest or prejudice in the use of water from a stream and that the person making the affidavit believes that because of the commissioner’s interest or prejudice he cannot obtain a fair and just division of water, the state engineer may designate a water commissioner from another district as substitute commissioner.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 142, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-68.1.

Presumptions by appropriator. —

Appropriator may presume not only that appropriators above him are taking only amount of water to which they are entitled, but also that officials who regulate and distribute waters of the state are doing their duty. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

§ 41-3-610.
Commissioners; authority and duties of substitute.

The substitute commissioner shall thereby be invested with the authority and duties possessed by the disqualified commissioner as to the portion of the stream in which the conflict of interest or prejudice is involved, subject to the same rights of appeal as are provided in other cases.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 142, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-68.2.

§ 41-3-611.
Commissioners; assistants.

Subject to legislative appropriation, a division superintendent may, in cases of emergency, employ suitable assistants to aid a water commissioner in the discharge of his duties. Assistants shall take the same oath as the water commissioner, shall obey his instructions, and each shall be compensated in an amount approved by the superintendent. The term of service of assistant commissioners may be terminated at any time by the water commissioner or the division superintendent, and shall in no event continue after the emergency has ceased to exist.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 44; R.S.1899, § 893; Laws 1903, ch. 28, § 1; 1907, ch. 86, § 9; C.S. 1910, § 804; C.S. 1920, § 925; R.S. 1931, § 122-306; C.S. 1945, § 71-308; Laws 1946, Sp. Sess., ch. 7, § 2; 1953, ch. 32, § 2; 1957, ch. 32, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-69; Laws 1973, ch. 130, § 1; 1991, ch. 157, § 1.

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911).

§ 41-3-612.
Rotation among water users; approval of commissioner.

To bring about a more economical use of the available water supply, it is lawful for water users owning lands to which are attached water rights, to rotate in the use of supply to which they may be collectively entitled, or a single water user, having lands to which water rights of a different priority attach, may in like manner rotate in use, provided that all water rights subject to rotation are in priority. Rotation of water will be allowed only if it can be accomplished without injury to other appropriators.

Prior to the commencement of any rotation in the use of water pursuant to this section, the owner or owners of the water rights to be rotated shall file a notice of intention to rotate with the appropriate water commissioner, on the form provided for that purpose by the commissioner, and shall obtain the water commissioner’s written approval which shall be endorsed on the form.

Performance of the rotation shall be enforced by the water commissioner in accordance with the terms and conditions included in the form signed and approved by the water commissioner. The state engineer may adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary for him to efficiently administer this section.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 108, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 806; C.S. 1920, § 927; Laws 1921, ch. 24, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-308; C.S. 1945, § 71-310; Laws 1957, ch. 208, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-70; Laws 1973, ch. 132, § 1.

§ 41-3-613.
Headgates, flumes or measuring devices; owners to construct and maintain; failure to comply.

The owner or owners of any ditch or canal shall maintain, to the satisfaction of the division superintendent of the division in which the irrigation works are located, a substantial headgate at the point where the water is diverted, which shall be of such construction that it can be locked and kept closed by the water commissioner; and such owners shall construct and maintain, when required by the division superintendent, flumes or other measuring devices at such points along such ditch as may be necessary for the purpose of assisting the water commissioner in determining the amount of water that is to be diverted into said ditch from the stream, or taken from it by the various users. Any and every owner or manager of a reservoir, located across or upon the bed of a natural stream, shall be required to construct and maintain, when required by the division superintendent, a flume or measuring device of a plan to be approved by the state engineer, below such reservoir at a point not to exceed six hundred (600) feet distant therefrom, and a flume or measuring device above such reservoir or each and every stream or source of supply discharging into such reservoir, for the purpose of assisting the water commissioner or superintendent in determining the amount of water to which prior appropriators are entitled and thereafter diverting it for such prior appropriators’ use. When it may be necessary, for the protection of other water users, the division superintendent has authority to require flumes to be installed along the line of any ditch. If any such owner or owners of irrigation works shall refuse or neglect to construct and put in such headgates, flumes or measuring devices after ten (10) days notice to do so by division superintendent, it shall be the duty of the water commissioner of the district in which such headgate is located, on order of the division superintendent, to close such ditch to the passage of water, and the same shall not be opened or any water diverted from the source of supply, under the penalties prescribed by W.S.

41-3-614

, until the requirements of the division superintendent as to such headgate, flumes or measuring device have been complied with, and if any owner, or manager of a reservoir located across the bed of a natural stream shall neglect or refuse to put in such measuring device after ten (10) days notice to do so by the division superintendent, the water commissioner shall open the sluice gate or outlet of such reservoir and the same shall not be closed under penalties pursuant to W.S.

41-3-614

, until the requirements of the division superintendent as to such measuring devices are complied with.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 46; R.S. 1899, § 930; Laws 1901, ch. 92, § 1; 1907, ch. 86, § 15; C.S. 1910, § 740; C.S. 1920, § 851; R.S. 1931; § 122-420; C.S. 1945, § 71-311; W.S. 1957, § 41-71; Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in the last sentence substituted provisions that penalties would be imposed pursuant to §

41-3-614

rather than penalties would be imposed as prescribed by law for the opening of headgates lawfully closed or penalties would be imposed as prescribed by law for changing or interfering with headgates.

Abandonment. —

Where ditches of water appropriator had for many years been abandoned and useless, and subsequently he applied for and acquired new permits, evidence sustained findings of nonuse for more than statutory period, together with an intention to abandon appropriation rights. Wyoming Hereford Ranch v. Hammond Packing Co., 33 Wyo. 14, 236 P. 764,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1925).

Headgates. —

This section only requires a headgate where water is diverted from the stream and does not require individual users of an irrigation project to install and maintain headgates when an allocation of water is made to the irrigation project as a whole. Dechert v. Christopulos, 604 P.2d 1039,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 223

(Wyo. 1980).

Decision of the State Engineer that a power company's headgate satisfied the requirements of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

41-3-613

was not contrary to law; while Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

41-3-613

might allow the State Engineer to require the power company to install a headgate at or near the site of its diversion dam, the statute did not mandate that the State Engineer do so. Because of the undisputed facts of the case, in particular the historical use of the dual diversion and the location of a suitable headgate at the adjudicated point of diversion, the State Engineer found the system to be maintained to his satisfaction, which was all that the statute required.
Wilson v. Tyrrell, 2011 WY 7, 246 P.3d 265,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Laramie Rivers Co. v. Pioneer Canal Co., 565 P.2d 1241,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo. 1977).

Cited

in

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1911).

§ 41-3-614.
Well, headgate or waterbox; prohibited acts; penalty for violation.

It shall be unlawful for any person to willfully use or possess water which has been lawfully denied by the water commissioner or other competent authority or to open, close, change or interfere with any well, pump, reservoir outlet valve, dam, diversion, headgate or waterbox without authority. Any violation of this section shall be punishable pursuant to W.S.

41-3-616

.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 42; R.S. 1899, § 971; Laws 1901, ch. 86, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 817; C.S. 1920, § 938; R.S. 1931, § 122-1205; C.S. 1945, § 71-304; W.S. 1957, § 41-72; Laws 1979, ch. 88, § 1; Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, which formerly imposed a fine of up to $500 for willful opening, closing, changing, interfering, or using water lawfully denied, and which provided that possession or use of water lawfully denied was prima facie evidence of guilt.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

§ 41-3-615.
Approval of diversion dam plans.

Plans for any diversion dam across the channel of a running stream, above five (5) feet in height, or of any other diversion dam intended to retain water above ten (10) feet in height, shall be submitted to the state engineer for his approval, and it shall be unlawful to construct such diversion dam until the said plans have been approved.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 48; 1895, ch. 45, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 931; C.S. 1910, § 825; C.S. 1920, § 947; R.S. 1931, § 122-1401; Laws 1939, ch. 68, § 2; 1943, ch. 24, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-312; W.S. 1957, § 41-73; Laws 2005, ch. 15, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to application for permit to construct reservoir, see §

41-3-302

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “Duplicate” from the beginning of the section.

Section does not relate to question of compensation for taking of water rights.

Thayer v. Rawlins, 594 P.2d 951,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 407

(Wyo. 1979).

Duty of state engineer. —

While this section requires the submission of plans on the part of applicants, it is no less the duty of the state engineer to exact them and he has the burden to enforce the administrative features of the law. The presumption is that he has performed his duties. Laramie Rivers Co. v. Levasseur, 65 Wyo. 414, 202 P.2d 680,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1949).

Date of application. —

Where application for a reservoir permit was returned by the engineer for additional information, and amended application was filed containing the information, date of filing was to be considered as date of the first application. Laughlin v. State Bd. of Control, 21 Wyo. 99, 128 P. 517,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1912).

Deviation from plans creates nuisance. —

Under this section, dam built, deviating from plans approved by state engineer, so that water was set back upon a nearby railroad, seriously endangering its operation in times of freshet, was a public nuisance, open to abatement on suit of the state. Big Horn Power Co. v. State, 23 Wyo. 271, 148 P. 1110,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1915).

Dam more than 10-feet high may be abated as nuisance

even though it is not in natural stream, but only as to the excess and reasonably without infliction of unnecessary injury. State v. Hiber, 48 Wyo. 172, 44 P.2d 1005,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1935).

Railroad could complain of dam completed before railroad. —

Railroad company holding order of state engineer limiting height of power dam could complain of superstructure, notwithstanding dam and its superstructure were completed before construction of the railroad. Clarke v. Boysen, 39 F.2d 800, 1930 U.S. App. LEXIS 4152 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 282 U.S. 869, 51 S. Ct. 75, 75 L. Ed. 768 (U.S. 1930).

Change of diversion point. —

City did not lose its adjudicated rights of priority by changing its point of diversion, and an adjudication by board of control of subsequent rights of diversion at the new point did not constitute a new appropriation, and the change of the point of diversion was not a nonuse so as to operate as a forfeiture. Van Tassel Real Estate & Livestock Co. v. Cheyenne, 49 Wyo. 333, 54 P.2d 906,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 299 U.S. 574, 57 S. Ct. 38, 81 L. Ed. 423, 1936 U.S. LEXIS 282 (U.S. 1936).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Riparian Rights in Appropriation States,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 130.

For case note, “Importation Doctrine Applied to Water Transfers Within a River System: A Step Too Far,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 99 (1980).

§ 41-3-616.
Penalties for violation of water laws.

Unless otherwise provided, any person violating any of the provisions of W.S.

41-3-112

,

41-3-208

,

41-3-301

,

41-3-614

,

41-3-914

,

41-3-919

,

41-3-938

,

41-4-501

,

41-4-504

,

41-5-107

,

41-5-108

or

41-5-110

after receipt of a written notice of violation from the state engineer’s office or the board of control is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250.00). Each day of noncompliance with the provisions of these sections after receipt of a written notice of violation from the state engineer’s office or the board of control shall be deemed a separate violation. The possession, use or presence upon any person’s land of water lawfully denied by the water commissioner or other competent authority is prima facie evidence of guilt.

Failure to comply with a written order issued by the state engineer pursuant to W.S.

41-3-112

,

41-3-208

,

41-3-301

,

41-3-318

,

41-3-614

,

41-3-914

,

41-3-919

,

41-3-938

,

41-4-501

,

41-5-107

,

41-5-108

or

41-5-110

, shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($1,250.00), or imprisonment for not more than three (3) months, or both. Each day of noncompliance with the order shall be deemed a separate violation.

Whenever, after notice and an opportunity to be heard, the state engineer finds the holder of any permit is willfully violating or has willfully violated any provision of a permit or any provision of W.S.

41-3-112

,

41-3-208

,

41-3-301

,

41-3-318

,

41-3-614

,

41-3-914

,

41-3-919

,

41-3-937

,

41-3-938

,

41-4-501

,

41-5-107

,

41-5-108

or

41-5-110

, or of any order issued pursuant thereto, the state engineer may cancel or suspend the permit or impose conditions on the future use thereof to prevent further violation. An appeal from any decision of the state engineer may be made to the board of control.

Whenever, after notice and opportunity to be heard, the board of control finds the holder of any certificate of registration or certificate of appropriation is willfully violating or has willfully violated any provision of the certificate or any provisions of W.S.

41-3-112

,

41-3-208

,

41-3-301

,

41-3-614

,

41-3-914

,

41-3-919

,

41-3-937

,

41-3-938

,

41-4-501

,

41-5-107

,

41-5-108

or

41-5-110

, or of any order issued pursuant thereto, the board of control may cancel or suspend the certificate or impose conditions on the future use thereof to prevent further violation. An appeal from any decision of the board of control may be taken to the district court.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 82, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.